Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1766.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 306(f.1)(1) of the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:Section 306. The following schedule of compensation is hereby established:* * *(f.1) (1) * * *(ii.1) (A) In addition to the above service, the employer shall provide for reimbursement to a qualifying patient who obtains medical marijuana for certified medical use under the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the "Medical 1234567891011121314151617181920 Marijuana Act." A qualifying patient shall:(I) be eligible for a dollar-for-dollar reimbursement on medical marijuana, for a maximum monthly reimbursement of two hundred fifty dollars ($250);(II) cover monthly amounts in excess of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) that the qualifying patient spends on medical marijuana or manufactured marijuana products which shall not be eligible for reimbursement under this subparagraph; and(III) be limited to a yearly maximum of three thousand dollars ($3,000) in reimbursements for medical marijuana.(B) An insurer shall establish a system to reimburse qualifying patients under this subparagraph on at least a quarterly basis.(C) A patient shall be eligible for reimbursement of the fee to obtain and renew the identification card required for a patient to be dispensed medical marijuana under the "Medical Marijuana Act."(D) As used in this subparagraph:(I) "Identification card" shall have the same meaning given to it under section 103 of the "Medical Marijuana Act."(II) "Medical marijuana" shall have the same meaning given to it under section 103 of the "Medical Marijuana Act."(III) "Patient" shall have the same meaning given to it under section 103 of the "Medical Marijuana Act."* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1766PN2175 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526